Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXXIII Administration of Trusts and Estates of Persons Under Disability
Subchapter 5 Creditor’s Claims — Spendthrift and Discretionary Trusts

386B.5-010.
Rights of beneficiary’s creditor or assignee.

To the extent a beneficiary’s interest is not subject to a spendthrift provision, the court may authorize a creditor or assignee of the beneficiary to reach the beneficiary’s interest by attachment of present or future distributions to or for the benefit of the beneficiary or other means.

The court may limit the award to such relief as is appropriate under the circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 40, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.5-020.
Spendthrift trusts.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires, “spendthrift trust” means a trust in which by the terms of the instrument creating it a valid restraint on the voluntary and involuntary alienation of the interest of a beneficiary is imposed.

Estates of every kind held or possessed in trust shall be subject to the debts and charges of the beneficiaries thereof the same as if the beneficiaries also owned the similar legal interest in the property, unless the trust is a spendthrift trust.

Specific language shall not be necessary to create a spendthrift trust, and it shall be sufficient if the instrument creating the trust manifests an intention to create a spendthrift trust.

If an instrument creating a trust provides that a beneficiary is entitled to receive income of the trust and that his interest shall not be alienable by him and shall not be subject to alienation by operation of law or legal process, the restraint on the voluntary and involuntary alienation of his right to income due and to accrue shall be valid.

If an instrument creating a trust provides that a beneficiary is entitled to receive principal of the trust at a future time and that his interest shall not be alienable by him and shall not be subject to alienation by operation of law or legal process, the restraint on the voluntary and involuntary alienation of his right to principal shall be valid.

Although a trust is a spendthrift trust, the interest of the beneficiary shall be subject to the satisfaction of an enforceable claim against the beneficiary:

By the spouse or child of the beneficiary for support, or by the spouse for maintenance;

If the trust is not a trust described in subsection (7)(b) of this section, by providers of necessary services rendered to the beneficiary or necessary supplies furnished to him; and

By the United States or this Commonwealth for taxes due from him or her on account of his or her interest in the trust or the income therefrom.

If a person creates for his or her own benefit a trust with a provision restraining the voluntary or involuntary alienation of his or her interest, his or her interest nevertheless shall be subject to alienation by operation of law or legal process.

This subsection shall not be construed to subject to alienation any interest in an individual retirement account or annuity, tax-sheltered annuity, simplified employee pension, pension, profit-sharing, stock bonus, or other retirement plan described in the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, which qualifies for the deferral of current income tax until the date benefits are distributed.

For purposes of this subsection, a person has not created a trust for such person’s own benefit solely because a trustee who is not such person is authorized under the trust instrument to pay or reimburse such person for, or pay directly to the taxing authorities, any tax on trust income or principal that is payable by such person under the law imposing the tax.

For the purposes of this section, amounts and property contributed to the following trusts are not deemed to have been contributed by the settlor of the trust, and a person who would otherwise be treated as a settlor or a deemed settlor of the following trusts shall not be treated as a settlor:

An irrevocable inter vivos marital trust that is treated as qualified terminable interest property under 26

U.S.C. sec. 2523(f)

, as amended, if the settlor is a beneficiary of the trust after the death of the settlor’s spouse;

An irrevocable inter vivos marital trust that is treated as a general power of appointment trust under 26

U.S.C. sec. 2523(e)

, as amended, if the settlor is a beneficiary of the trust after the death of the settlor’s spouse;

An irrevocable inter vivos trust for the spouse of the settlor that does not qualify for the gift tax marital deduction if the settlor is a beneficiary of the trust only after the death of the settlor’s spouse;

A special needs trust as defined in KRS

387.860

, including a trust established pursuant to judicial action under KRS

387.855

;

A trust created under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p(d)(4)(A) or (C); and

A trust created under 42

U.S.C. sec. 1396

p(c)(2)(B).

For the purposes of this subsection, a person is a beneficiary whether so named under the initial trust instrument or through the exercise by that person’s spouse or by another person of a limited or general power of appointment.

For the purposes of this section, the settlor shall be any person who:

Created the trust;

Contributed property to the trust; or

Is deemed to have contributed property to the trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 41, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.5-030.
Discretionary trusts — Effect of standard.

As used in this section, “child” includes any person for whom an order or judgment for child support has been entered in this Commonwealth or another state.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) of this subsection, whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a creditor of a beneficiary may not compel a distribution that is subject to the trustee’s discretion, even if:

The discretion is expressed in the form of a standard of distribution; or

The trustee has abused the discretion.

To the extent a trustee has not complied with a standard of distribution or has abused a discretion:

A distribution may be ordered by the court to satisfy a judgment or court order against the beneficiary for support or maintenance of the beneficiary’s child or spouse; and

The court shall direct the trustee to pay to the child or spouse such amount as is equitable under the circumstances, but not more than the amount the trustee would have been required to distribute to or for the benefit of the beneficiary had the trustee complied with the standard or not abused the discretion.

This section shall not limit the right of a beneficiary to maintain a judicial proceeding against a trustee for an abuse of discretion or failure to comply with a standard for distribution.

If the trustee’s or cotrustee’s discretion to make distributions for the trustee’s or cotrustee’s own benefit is limited by an ascertainable standard, a creditor may not reach or compel distribution of the beneficial interest, except to the extent the interest would be subject to the creditor’s claim were the beneficiary not acting as trustee or cotrustee.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 42, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.5-040.
Creditor’s claim against settlor.

Subject to the statutory provisions of KRS Chapter 396 regarding claims against decedents’ estates, whether or not the terms of a trust contain a spendthrift provision, the following rules apply:

During the lifetime of the settlor, the property of a revocable trust is subject to claims of the settlor’s creditors;

With respect to an irrevocable trust, a creditor or assignee of the settlor may reach the maximum amount that can be distributed to or for the settlor’s benefit. If a trust has more than one (1) settlor, the amount the creditor or assignee of a particular settlor may reach may not exceed the settlor’s interest in the portion of the trust attributable to that settlor’s contribution; and

After the death of a settlor, and subject to the settlor’s right to direct the source from which liabilities shall paid, the property of a trust that was revocable at the settlor’s death is subject to claims of the settlor’s creditors, costs of administration of the settlor’s estate, the expenses of the settlor’s funeral and disposal of remains, and statutory allowances to a surviving spouse and children to the extent the settlor’s probate estate is inadequate to satisfy those claims, costs, expenses, and allowances, but no property added to a revocable trust on account of the settlor’s death from a source other than the settlor’s estate or another revocable trust created by the settlor shall be subject to claims of the settlor’s creditors, costs of administration of the settlor’s estate, the expenses of the settlor’s funeral and disposal of remains, and statutory allowances to a surviving spouse and children.

For purposes of this section:

During the period the power may be exercised, the holder of a power of withdrawal is treated in the same manner as the settlor of a revocable trust to the extent of the property subject to the power; and

Upon the lapse, release, or waiver of the power, the holder is not treated as the settlor of the trust.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 43, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.5-050.
Overdue distribution.

As used in this section, “mandatory distribution” means a distribution of income or principal which the trustee is required to make to a beneficiary under the terms of the trust, including a distribution on termination of the trust. The term shall not include a distribution subject to the exercise of the trustee’s discretion even if:

The discretion is expressed in the form of a standard of distribution; or

The terms of the trust authorizing a distribution couple language of discretion with language of direction.

Whether or not a trust contains a spendthrift provision, a creditor or assignee of a beneficiary may reach a mandatory distribution of income or principal, including a distribution on termination of the trust, if the trustee has not made the distribution to the beneficiary within a reasonable time after the designated distribution date.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 44, effective July 15, 2014.

386B.5-060.
Personal obligations of trustee.

Trust property is not subject to personal obligations of the trustee, even if the trustee becomes insolvent or bankrupt.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 25, § 45, effective July 15, 2014.